Massachusetts, session 194th, H4235.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1: Notwithstanding chapter 32 of the General Laws or any other general or 
special law to the contrary, Scott Weigel, chief of the fire department of the town of Rochester, 
may continue in service in such position until he reaches the age of 70; provided, however, that 
he is mentally and physically capable of performing the duties of such position. The town of 
Rochester may, at its own expense, require Scott Weigel to undergo an annual examination by an 
impartial physician designated by the town to determine his capability to remain in service. No 
further deductions shall be made from the regular compensation of Scott Weigel under said 
chapter 32 for any service subsequent to his reaching 65 years of age and, upon retirement, Scott 
Weigel shall receive a superannuation retirement allowance equal to that which he would have 
been entitled had he retired at 65 years of age. 
Section 2: This Act shall take effect upon its passage.